Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF887.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 10A.711, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended by striking the subsection. Sec. 2. Section 10A.711, subsection 13, paragraph f, Code 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. Sec. 3. Section 135.119, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. Sec. 4. Section 135.131, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: a. âBirth centerâ means birth center as defined in section 10A.711 a facility or institution, which is not an ambulatory surgical center or a hospital or in a hospital, in which births are planned to occur following a normal, uncomplicated, low-risk pregnancy . Sec. 5. Section 135P.1, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 3. âHealth facilityâ means an institutional health facility as defined in section 10A.711 , a birth center as defined in section 135.131, a hospice licensed under chapter 135J , a home health agency as defined in section 144D.1 , an assisted living program certified under chapter 231C , a clinic, a community health center, or the university of Iowa hospitals and clinics, and includes any corporation, professional House File 887, p. 2 corporation, partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or other entity comprised of such health facilities. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 887, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor